Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-686.01
Withdrawal and transfer of less than 150 acre-feet; injured person; hearing; civil action; appeal; attorney's fees.

The Chief Water Officer shall have jurisdiction over any ground water withdrawal and transfer made under section 46-678.01. Any person using ground water at the time a notice to transfer is filed under such section whose wells thereafter suffer an unanticipated decline in ground water levels may petition the Chief Water Officer for a hearing. Such petition shall specifically set forth the cause and extent of the ground water decline as well as the nature and extent of any injury resulting from that decline. If at such hearing the injured party presents evidence showing that the ground water levels declined as a result of such transfer and shows the nature and extent of any resulting injury, the Chief Water Officer may issue an order terminating or conditioning the transfer to eliminate any further injury. If the injured party prevails and an order is issued pursuant to this section, the order shall provide that the person filing the notice of transfer shall pay the costs of the Chief Water Officer and department staff and of the injured party, including reasonable attorney's fees. The injured party may maintain a civil action against the person filing the notice of transfer to recover the costs of a hydrologic evaluation. The order of the Chief Water Officer may be appealed to the Court of Appeals.

Laws 1993, LB 789, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 222;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 201.